Missouri, session 2026, HB2384.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 67.280, RSMo, is repealed and two new sections enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as sections 67.280 and 67.486, to read as follows:
67.280. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Code", any published compilation of rules prepared by various technical trade
associations, federal agencies, this state or any agency thereof, but shall be limited to:
regulations concerning the construction of buildings and continued occupancy thereof;
mechanical, plumbing, and electrical construction; and fire prevention;
(2) "Community", any county, fire protection district or municipality;
(3) "County", any county in the state;
(4) "Fire protection district", any fire protection district in the state;
(5) "Municipality", any incorporated city, town or village.
2. Any community, if the community otherwise has the power under the law to adopt
such an ordinance, may adopt or repeal an ordinance which incorporates by reference the
provisions of any code or portions of any code, or any amendment thereof, properly identified
as to date and source, without setting forth the provisions of such code in full. At least one
copy of such code, portion or amendment which is incorporated or adopted by reference, shall
be filed in the office of the clerk of the community and there kept available for public use,
inspection, and examination. The filing requirements herein prescribed shall not be deemed
to be complied with unless the required copies of such codes, portion, or amendment or public
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2384 2
record are filed with the clerk of such community for a period of ninety days prior to the
adoption of the ordinance which incorporates such code, portion, or amendment by reference.
3. Any ordinance adopting a code, portion, or amendment by reference shall state the
penalty for violating such code, portion, or amendment, or any provisions thereof separately,
and no part of any such penalty shall be incorporated by reference.
4. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no county or
municipality shall enact, adopt, or maintain any ordinance, resolution, regulation, code,
or policy that mandates an owner, builder, or developer to comply with energy efficiency
or other energy related standards or requirements that exceed those permitted under
this section in the construction, maintenance, repair, or renovation of one- or two-family
dwellings, condominiums, or multiunit townhouses, multiunit apartment buildings, or
commercial or industrial buildings including, but not limited to:
(a) Energy efficiency standards or features exceeding those in paragraphs (b)
and (c) below;
(b) Standards or features exceeding energy standards or features defined in the
2009 International Residential Code (IRC); or
(c) Standards or features exceeding energy standards or features established in
the 2009 International Energy Conservation Code (IECC).
(2) An ordinance, resolution, regulation, code, or policy enacted, adopted, or
maintained in violation of this subsection shall be null and void.
5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no county or
municipality shall enact, adopt, or maintain any ordinance, resolution, regulation, code,
or policy that prohibits a building of less than six stories with a Group R-2 occupancy or
its equivalent, as defined in a building code adopted by the county or municipality if
such county or municipality has adopted a building code, to be served by a single exit if:
(1) The building has no more than six stories above grade plane;
(2) The building does not contain more than four dwelling units on any floor;
(3) An exterior stairway or interior exit stairway is provided;
(4) A corridor separates each dwelling unit entry or exit door from the door to
an interior exit stairway, including any related exit passageway on each floor, and the
dwelling unit doors do not open directly into an interior exit stairway but may open
directly into an exterior stairway;
(5) There is no more than twenty feet of travel to the exit stairway from the door
for entry or exit, or both, of any dwelling unit;
(6) Other occupancies in the same building do not have access to the Group R-2
occupancy portion of the building or with the single-exit stairway;

HCS HB 2384 3
(7) The exit serving the Group R-2 occupancy does not discharge through any
other occupancy, including an accessory parking garage; and
(8) There are no openings within ten feet of unprotected openings into the
stairway other than required exit doors having a one-hour fire-resistive rating.
67.486. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Political subdivision", a local public body created under the Constitution of
Missouri or by the general assembly that exercises governmental functions for purposes
of a request made under this section;
(2) "Request", an application for a permit, license, variance, or any other kind
of prior approval from a political subdivision for an action related to the construction of
a new residential, commercial, or industrial building or the repair or renovation of any
such existing building.
2. (1) If an applicant submits a request to a political subdivision, the political
subdivision shall approve or deny the applicant's request within thirty calendar days.
(2) If no response is received by an applicant within thirty calendar days, the
request shall be deemed approved and the applicant is authorized to proceed with the
construction as provided in the request.
(3) If the request is approved, the political subdivision shall not impose on the
applicant additional requirements related to the request.
(4) (a) If the political subdivision denies the request, the political subdivision
shall state in writing to the applicant the reasons for the denial.
(b) The written denial shall include, but not be limited to, the following:
a. If the request relates to work that is stamped by a certified design professional
and such request is denied on the basis of the political subdivision's rejection of such
work, a detailed description of why the work of the design professional who stamped
such work is so inferior or so insufficient that the political subdivision cannot approve
the request; and
b. If the request is denied on the basis of a violation of a code provision
governing any part of the development or improvement that is the subject of the
request, a citation to the code provision the political subdivision determines has been
violated.
(5) The time limit in this subsection begins upon the political subdivision's
receipt of the applicant's request.
3. (1) A political subdivision may deny an applicant's request under subsection 2
of this section as incomplete.

HCS HB 2384 4
(2) The request is incomplete if the political subdivision determines the request
fails to contain all information required by law, or by rule, ordinance, or policy of the
political subdivision adopted prior to the submission of the request.
(3) If the political subdivision denies a request as incomplete, the political
subdivision shall state in writing to the applicant the reasons for the denial of the
request as incomplete.
(4) If an applicant resubmits a request after receiving a written denial as
required under this section, the political subdivision shall not issue a subsequent denial
that includes additional unrelated reasons for denial that were unspecified and not
included in the denial of the initial request.
(5) The time limit in subsection 2 of this section shall reset only if, within twenty
calendar days of receipt of the applicant's request, the political subdivision sends
written notice to the applicant of the denial of the request as incomplete.
✔